Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 42.
STATE HIGHWAY COMMISSION.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by S.J.R. No. 7 (see Acts 1951, p. 970) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on March 20, 1951. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 4, 1952, by a vote of 231,529 for and 78,291 against.

§ 1. Commission created — Members — Powers.

There is hereby created a State Highway Commission which shall be vested with all the powers and duties now or hereafter imposed by law for the administration of the State Highway Department, together with all powers necessary or proper to enable the Commission or any of its officers or employees to carry out fully and effectively the regulations and laws relating to the State Highway Department.

§ 2. Qualifications and appointment of members — Terms of office of first commission.

Within ten days after the convening of the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas in the year 1953, the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint five persons who are qualified electors of the State to constitute the State Highway Commission for terms of two, four, six, eight and ten years respectively. The terms of the persons so appointed shall be determined by lot. The Commissioners to be appointed from the State at large; provided, however, that no two Commissioners shall be appointed from any single Congressional District.

In the event of rejection by the Senate of a person whose name has been so submitted, the Governor shall within five days after receipt of written notice from the Secretary of the Senate of such rejection submit the name of another appointee to fill such vacancy. In the event the Governor should within five days thereafter fail to appoint or fail to submit to the Senate for confirmation the name of any person to be appointed, the Senate shall proceed to make the appointment of its own choice.

Cross References.

State Highway Commission members, § 27-65-104.

§ 3. Terms of office of members.

Upon the expiration of the foregoing terms of said Commissioners, a successor shall be appointed by the Governor in the manner provided for in Section 2 for a term of ten years, which term shall thereafter be for each member of the Commission.

§ 4. Removal of members — Hearing — Review and appeal.

A Commissioner may be removed by the Governor only for the same causes as apply to other constitutional officers after a hearing which may be reviewed by the Chancery Court for the First District with right of appeal therefrom to the Supreme Court, such review and appeal to be without presumption in favor of any finding by the Governor or the trial court, and provided further, in addition to the right of confirmation hereinabove reserved to the Senate, the Senate may upon the written request of at least Five (5) of its members that a member or members of the Commission should be removed therefrom, proceed, when in session, to hear any and all evidence pertinent to the reasons for removal. The member or members whose removal is so requested shall be entitled to be heard in the matter and to be represented before the Senate by legal Counsel. These proceedings conducted by the Senate shall be public and a transcript of the testimony so heard shall be prepared and preserved in the journal of the Senate. The taking of evidence either orally or by deposition shall not be bound by the formal rules of evidence. Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the Senate, sitting as a body in executive session, may remove said member or members of the Commission by a majority vote conducted by secret ballot.

Publisher's Notes.

Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution, effective July 1, 2001, established circuit courts as the trial courts of original jurisdiction of all justiciable matters not otherwise assigned pursuant to the Constitution and specifically provided that “jurisdiction conferred on Circuit Courts established by this Amendment includes all matter previously cognizable by Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts…”.

§ 5. Vacancies — Filling.

Vacancies on the Commission due to resignations, death or removal shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the unexpired term within thirty days from the date of such vacancy. Upon failure of the Governor to fill the vacancy within thirty days, the remaining Commissioners shall make the appointment for the unexpired term.

§ 6. Director of Highways.

The Commission shall appoint a Director of Highways who shall have such duties as may be prescribed by the Commission or by statute.